Rhode Island statutes. Title 40 Human Services
Chapter 8.1 Personal Care Attendant Program

40-8.1-1.
Authority to establish program — Administration.

The department of human services is hereby authorized to establish a participant-directed personal care attendant program for those with severe physical disabilities, to provide personal attendant care to those disabled individuals who meet certain eligibility criteria hereinafter stated. The department of human services shall be responsible for the administration of the program but may contract with other state agencies or nonprofit organizations in connection with the program.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 122, § 1.

40-8.1-2.
Services provided.

Services that may be provided eligible persons if not available from other sources include:

Any appropriate vocational rehabilitation service, as well as other services that will enhance the ability of individuals with disabilities to live independently and function within the family and community;

Personal care attendant services;

Advocacy services;

Peer counseling;

Housing; and

Transportation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 122, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 98; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 98.

40-8.1-3.
Eligibility for services.

Services available under this chapter may be provided to any person who meets the following criteria:

Has made application therefor to the director of the department of human services in a manner prescribed by the director;

Has a severe physical disability that caused the person to be unduly dependent, the disability to be certified by the division of vocational rehabilitation; and

Has not sufficient income or resources to meet the cost of home-care services, a determination of insufficiency to be made by the division of vocational rehabilitation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 122, § 1.

40-8.1-4.
When services may be provided.

Personal care attendant services may be provided when:

The requirements of §

40-8.1-3

are met; and

An attendant is available to provide the care needed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 122, § 1.

40-8.1-5.
Appropriations.

There is hereby appropriated to the department of human services funds adequate to implement an independent-living program, including a participant-directed personal care attendant program, in the amount of ninety-five thousand dollars ($95,000) for fiscal year ending June 30, 1980. Additional funds shall be made available on a yearly basis to maintain the program.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 122, § 1.